Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 2. Adult Day Care and Family Respite Care.

Sec. 47.65.100.
Adult day care and family respite care.

In addition to administering grants for adult day care programs and family respite care services for older Alaskans under AS

47.65.010

—

47.65.050

, the department may make grants under this section from funds otherwise available to it for adult day care programs and family respite care services for frail older persons and other similarly disabled adults.

In order to fund grants under this section, the department may seek and enter into contracts or grants with any party, including reimbursable service agreements with other state agencies.

The department shall, by regulation, set fees for services provided under this section. The fees must be based on a sliding scale formula that takes into account the client’s income.

Fees established under (c) of this section may not exceed the cost of the service. A person may not be denied service based solely on inability to pay a fee established under this section.

The department may not award a grant under this section for family respite care services or for adult day care services that include home care services unless the grantee has agreed to request criminal history record information as permitted by P.L. 105-277 and AS 12.62 for the individual who will provide the services within 10 business days after the individual is hired to provide the services and review the information within five business days after receiving it.

In this section,

“frail older person” means a state resident who is at risk of institutional placement and

is age 55 or older; or

has Alzheimer’s disease or a related disorder;

“similarly disabled adult” means a state resident who is 18 years of age or older who is at risk of institutional placement but who is not a frail older person or an older Alaskan.

History.

(§ 4 ch 37 SLA 1990; am § 7 ch 45 SLA 1994; am E.O. No. 108 § 86 (2003); am § 4 ch 23 SLA 2004; am §§ 16 — 19 ch 34 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.65.055. Renumbered in 1990. Subsection (e) was enacted as (f). Relettered in 1994, at which time former (e) was relettered as (f).

Cross references. —

P.L. 105-277, division A, Sec. 101(b) (title I, Sec. 124(a)), 112 Stat. 2681-50, 2681-73, provided that: “A nursing facility or home health care agency may submit a request to the Attorney General to conduct a search and exchange of [criminal history records corresponding to the fingerprints or other identification information submitted] regarding an applicant for employment if the employment position is involved in direct patient care.”

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “Department of Health and Social Services” for “Department of Administration” in subsection (b).

The 2004 amendment, effective April 24, 2004, in subsection (e), substituted “criminal history record information as permitted by P.L. 105-277 and AS 12.62” for “records under AS 12.62.035(a)” and made related changes.

The 2008 amendment, effective August 20, 2008, substituted “department” for “commission” in subsections (a), (b), (c), and (e), and deleted “and the department of health and social services” preceding “may seek and enter” in subsection (b).